Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.605.040

Family, school, and community partnerships—School building spaces.

School districts are encouraged to strengthen family, school, and community partnerships by creating spaces in school buildings, if space is available, where students and families can access the services they need, such as after-school tutoring, dental and health services, counseling, or clothing and food banks.

[ 2010 c 235 s 701.]

NOTES:

Finding—2010 c 235: See note following RCW 28A.405.245.